Hawaii, session 2025, HB484.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 346, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§346-     Hawaii efficient transitional homes commission.  (a) There is established within the department the Hawaii efficient transitional homes commission to: (1)  Oversee the strategic development, operation, and funding of transitional homes; (2)  Enhance the efficient management of transitional homes through technology and data-driven approaches; and (3)  Promote accountability through the development of performance metrics and recommendations for transparent operations. (b)  The commission shall comprise: (1)  The director of health, or the director's designee; (2)  The director of public safety, or the director's designee; (3)  The director of corrections and rehabilitation, or the director's designee; (4)  The director of human services, or the director's designee; (5)  The administrator of the state health planning and development agency, or the administrator's designee; (6)  A representative of the judiciary; and (7)       members representing relevant nonprofit organizations, including organizations working in  technology, to be selected by the chairperson of the commission and invited to participate. (c)  The commission shall select a chairperson from among its members. (d)  Members of the commission shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for reasonable expenses, including travel expenses, incurred in carrying out their duties. (e)  The commission shall develop performance metrics and recommendations for the efficient, effective, and transparent management of transitional homes, including recommendations regarding: (1)  Lean management practices for transitional home operations, focusing on quality service delivery; (2)  The use of technology for real-time monitoring of home conditions and residents' needs; (3)  The establishment of community liaison roles within each transitional home to manage relations, feedback, and reintegration efforts; (4)  The establishment of resident-led advisory boards within each transitional home to influence policy and operational decisions; (5)  The use of artificial intelligence and analytics for performance audits, to ensure the rapid identification and correction of inefficiencies; (6)  The development of an interactive public dashboard to provide transparency regarding the transitional homes' operations, finances, and outcomes; (7)  The development of a digital platform to allow stakeholder feedback and community input on the management of transitional homes; (8)  The establishment of key performance metrics for transitional homes, focused on resident outcomes, operational efficiency, and community satisfaction; and (9)  The monitoring and enforcement of statutory limits on the residency of transitional homes, which allow two residents and a resident manager. (f)  The commission shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session, beginning with the regular session of 2026. (g) For the purposes of this section, "transitional home" means a residence for persons needing support in recovery or disability care, or in transitioning from homelessness or incarceration.  "Transitional home" includes clean and sober homes." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________